Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1033.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 698.3, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 698.3. A. The State Board of Veterinary Medical
Examiners is hereby re-created, to continue until July 1, 2025 2030,
in accordance with the provisions of the Oklahoma Sunset Law, to
regulate and enforce the practice of veterinary medicine in this
state in accordance with the Oklahoma Veterinary Practice Act.
B. 1. The duty of determining a person's initial and
continuing qualification and fitness for the practice of veterinary
medicine, of proceeding against the unlawful and unlicensed practice
of veterinary medicine and of enforcing the Oklahoma Veterinary
Practice Act is hereby delegated to the Board. That duty shall be
discharged in accordance with the Oklahoma Veterinary Practice Act
and other applicable statutes.
2. a. It is necessary that the powers conferred on the Board
by the Oklahoma Veterinary Practice Act be construed
to protect the health, safety and welfare of the
people of this state.

b. No member of the Board, acting in that capacity or as
a member of any Board committee, shall participate in
the making of any decision or the taking of any action
affecting such member's own personal, professional or
pecuniary interest, or that of a person related to the
member within the third degree by consanguinity,
marriage or adoption or of a business or professional
associate.
c. With advice of legal counsel, the Board shall adopt
and annually review a conflict of interest policy to
enforce the provisions of the Oklahoma Veterinary
Practice Act.
C. The practice of veterinary medicine is a privilege granted
by the people of this state acting through their elected
representatives. It is not a natural right of individuals. In the
interest of the public, and to protect the public, it is necessary
to provide laws and rules to govern the granting and subsequent use
of the privilege to practice veterinary medicine. The primary
responsibility and obligation of the Board is to protect the public
from the unprofessional, improper, incompetent and unlawful practice
of veterinary medicine.
D. The liability of any member or employee of the Board acting
within the scope of Board duties or employment shall be governed by
The Governmental Tort Claims Act.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1033 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 24th day of February,
2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 21st day of April, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1033 Page 3